Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5367XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5367XD (2) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 907.3, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph:
NEW SUBPARAGRAPH. (17) The defendant was a public employee
or public official at the time of the offense and the amount
taken by the defendant from the public employer exceeded ten
thousand dollars.
Sec. 2. Section 907.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026,
is amended by adding the following new subparagraph:
NEW SUBPARAGRAPH. (10) The defendant was a public employee
or public official at the time of the offense and the amount
taken by the defendant from the public employer exceeded ten
thousand dollars.
Sec. 3. Section 907.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. i. The sentence of a defendant who was a
public employee or public official at the time of the offense
and the amount taken by the defendant from the public employer
exceeded ten thousand dollars unless the defendant establishes,
by clear and convincing evidence, and the sentencing court
finds and states specifically on the record, the existence
of mitigating circumstances warranting a departure from the
otherwise applicable mandatory term of incarceration.
Sec. 4. Section 907.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. For the purposes of this section:
a. “Public employee” means any individual employed by a
public employer and includes a contractor or vendor.
b. “Public employer” means the state, its boards,
commissions, agencies, and departments, and its political
subdivisions including school districts and other special
purpose districts.
c. “Public official” means the same as defined in section
68B.2.